New Jersey, session 222, S2762.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. R.S.33:1-12 is amended to read as follows: 33:1-12.  Class C licenses shall be subdivided and classified as follows: Plenary retail consumption license.  1.  The holder of this license shall be entitled, subject to rules and regulations, to sell any alcoholic beverages for consumption on the licensed premises by the glass or other open receptacle, and also to sell any alcoholic beverages in original containers for consumption off the licensed premises; but this license shall not be issued to permit the sale of alcoholic beverages in or upon any premises in which a grocery, delicatessen, drug store or other mercantile business is carried on, except as hereinafter provided. The holder of this license shall be permitted to conduct consumer wine, beer and spirits tasting events and samplings for a fee or on a complimentary basis pursuant to conditions established by rules and regulations of the Division of Alcoholic Beverage Control, provided however, that the holder of this license complies with the terms and conditions set forth in section 3 of P.L.2009, c.216 (C.33:1-12d).  Subject to such rules and regulations established from time to time by the director, the holder of this license shall be permitted to sell alcoholic beverages in or upon the premises in which any of the following is carried on:  the keeping of a hotel or restaurant including the sale of mercantile items incidental thereto as an accommodation to patrons; the sale, at an entertainment facility as defined in R.S.33:1-1, having a seating capacity for no less than 4,000 patrons, of mercantile items traditionally associated with the type of event or program held at the site; the sale of distillers', brewers' and vintners' packaged merchandise prepacked as a unit with other suitable objects as gift items to be sold only as a unit; the sale of novelty wearing apparel identified with the name of the establishment licensed under the provisions of this section; the sale of cigars, cigarettes, packaged crackers, chips, nuts and similar snacks and ice at retail as an accommodation to patrons, or the retail sale of nonalcoholic beverages as accessory beverages to alcoholic beverages; or, in commercial bowling establishments, the retail sale or rental of bowling accessories and the retail sale from vending machines of candy, ice cream and nonalcoholic beverages.  The fee for this license shall be fixed by the governing board or body of the municipality in which the licensed premises are situated, by ordinance, at not less than $250 and not more than $2,500.  No ordinance shall be enacted which shall raise or lower the fee to be charged for this license by more than [20%] 20 percent from that charged in the preceding license year or [$500.00] $500, whichever is the lesser.  The governing board or body of each municipality may, by ordinance, enact that no plenary retail consumption license shall be granted within its respective municipality. The holder of this license shall be permitted to obtain a restricted brewery license issued pursuant to subsection 1c. of R.S.33:1-10 and to operate a restricted brewery immediately adjoining the licensed premises in accordance with the restrictions set forth in that subsection.  All fees related to the issuance of both licenses shall be paid in accordance with statutory law. Seasonal retail consumption license.  2.  (1) The holder of this license shall be entitled, subject to rules and regulations, to sell any alcoholic beverages for consumption on the licensed premises by the glass or other open receptacle, and also to sell any alcoholic beverages in original containers for consumption off the licensed premises, during the summer season from May 1 until November 14, inclusive, or during the winter season from November 15 until April 30, inclusive. (2)   In addition, the director shall issue to the holder of this license, upon request by the licensee, one-day permits that shall entitle the license holder to sell alcoholic beverages for consumption on the licensed premises during the season when the license holder is not authorized to sell alcoholic beverages pursuant to subparagraph (1) of this subsection.  The number of one-day permits issued to a licensee pursuant to this subsection shall not exceed an aggregate of 14 permits in one calendar year.  A one-day permit issued pursuant to this subsection shall be valid for 24 consecutive hours.  The fee for each one-day permit shall be $500. The governing body of the municipality in which the licensed premises is situated may place reasonable conditions upon a one-day permit for the purpose of maintaining public safety on the licensed premises and immediately surrounding area.  The costs associated with the reasonable conditions placed on the one-day permit shall be assumed by the holder of this license. (3)   This license shall not be issued to permit the sale of alcoholic beverages in or upon any premises in which a grocery, delicatessen, drug store or other mercantile business is carried on, except as hereinafter provided.  Subject to such rules and regulations established from time to time by the director, the holder of this license shall be permitted to sell alcoholic beverages in or upon the premises in which any of the following is carried on:  the keeping of a hotel or restaurant including the sale of mercantile items incidental thereto as an accommodation to patrons; the sale of distillers', brewers' and vintners' packaged merchandise prepacked as a unit with other suitable objects as gift items to be sold only as a unit; the sale of novelty wearing apparel identified with the name of the establishment licensed under the provisions of this section; the sale of cigars, cigarettes, packaged crackers, chips, nuts and similar snacks and ice at retail as an accommodation to patrons; or the retail sale of nonalcoholic beverages as accessory beverages to alcoholic beverages.  The fee for this license shall be fixed by the governing board or body of the municipality in which the licensed premises are situated, by ordinance, at [75%] 75 percent of the fee fixed by said board or body for plenary retail consumption licenses. The governing board or body of each municipality may, by ordinance, enact that no seasonal retail consumption license shall be granted within its respective municipality. Plenary retail distribution license.  3.  a.  The holder of this license shall be entitled, subject to rules and regulations, to sell any alcoholic beverages for consumption off the licensed premises, but only in original containers; except that licensees shall be permitted to conduct consumer wine, beer, and spirits tasting events and samplings on a complimentary basis pursuant to conditions established by rules and regulations of the Division of Alcoholic Beverage Control, provided however, that the holder of this license complies with the terms and conditions set forth in section 3 of P.L.2009, c.216 (C.33:1-12d). The governing board or body of each municipality may, by ordinance, enact that this license shall not be issued to permit the sale of alcoholic beverages in or upon any premises in which any other mercantile business is carried on, except that any such ordinance, heretofore or hereafter adopted, shall not prohibit the retail sale of distillers', brewers' and vintners' packaged merchandise prepacked as a unit with other suitable objects as gift items to be sold only as a unit; the sale of novelty wearing apparel identified with the name of the establishment licensed under the provisions of this act; cigars, cigarettes, packaged crackers, chips, nuts and similar snacks, ice, and nonalcoholic beverages as accessory beverages to alcoholic beverages.  The fee for this license shall be fixed by the governing board or body of the municipality in which the licensed premises are situated, by ordinance, at not less than $125 and not more than $2,500.  No ordinance shall be enacted which shall raise or lower the fee to be charged for this license by more than [20%] 20 percent from that charged in the preceding license year or [$500.00] $500, whichever is the lesser.  The governing board or body of each municipality may, by ordinance, enact that no plenary retail distribution license shall be granted within its respective municipality. Limited retail distribution license.  3.  b.  The holder of this license shall be entitled, subject to rules and regulations, to sell any unchilled, brewed, malt alcoholic beverages in quantities of not less than 72 fluid ounces for consumption off the licensed premises, but only in original containers; provided, however, that this license shall be issued only for premises operated and conducted by the licensee as a bona fide grocery store, meat market, meat and grocery store, delicatessen, or other type of bona fide food store at which groceries or other foodstuffs are sold at retail; and provided further that this license shall not be issued except for premises at which the sale of groceries or other foodstuffs is the primary and principal business and at which the sale of alcoholic beverages is merely incidental and subordinate thereto.  The fee for this license shall be fixed by the governing body or board of the municipality in which the licensed premises are situated, by ordinance, at not less than $31 and not more than $63.  The governing board or body of each municipality may, by ordinance, enact that no limited retail distribution license shall be granted within its respective municipality. Plenary retail transit license.  4.  The holder of this license shall be entitled, subject to rules and regulations, to sell any alcoholic beverages, for consumption only, on railroad trains, airplanes, limousines and boats, while in transit.  The fee for this license for use by a railroad or air transport company shall be $375, for use by the owners of limousines shall be $31 per vehicle, and for use on a boat shall be $63 on a boat 65 feet or less in length, $125 on a boat more than 65 feet in length but not more than 110 feet in length, and $375 on a boat more than 110 feet in length; such boat lengths shall be determined in the manner prescribed by the Bureau of Customs of the United States Government or any federal agency successor thereto for boat measurement in connection with issuance of marine documents.  A license issued under this provision to a railroad or air transport company shall cover all railroad cars and planes operated by any such company within the State of New Jersey.  A license for a boat or limousine issued under this provision shall apply only to the particular boat or limousine for which issued, and shall permit the purchase of alcoholic beverages for sale or service in a boat or limousine to be made from any Class A and B licensee or from any Class C licensee whose license privilege permits the sale of alcoholic beverages in original containers for off-premises consumption.  An interest in a plenary retail transit license issued in accordance with this section shall be excluded in determining the maximum number of retail licenses permitted under P.L.1962, c.152 (C.33:1-12.31 et seq.). Club license.  5.  The holder of this license shall be entitled, subject to rules and regulations, to sell any alcoholic beverages but only for immediate consumption on the licensed premises and only to bona fide club members and their guests.  The fee for this license shall be fixed by the governing board or body of the municipality in which the licensed premises are situated, by ordinance, at not less than $63 and not more than $188.  The governing board or body of each municipality may, by ordinance, enact that no club licenses shall be granted within its respective municipality.  Club licenses may be issued only to such corporations, associations and organizations as are operated for benevolent, charitable, fraternal, social, religious, recreational, athletic, or similar purposes, and not for private gain, and which comply with all conditions which may be imposed by the Director of the Division of Alcoholic Beverage Control by rules and regulations. The provisions of section 23 of P.L.2003, c.117 amendatory of this section shall apply to licenses issued or transferred on or after July 1, 2003, and to license renewals commencing on or after July 1, 2003. Sporting facility license.  6. The holder of this license shall be entitled, subject to rules and regulations, to sell at retail or to serve any alcoholic beverages as the owner, operator, lessee, or concessionaire of a sporting facility by the glass or other receptacle or in original containers only on the premises of the sporting facility. Notwithstanding any other provision of Title 33 of the Revised Statutes and subject to conditions established by the director, the holder of this license may share direction and control of the premises to be licensed and share proceeds and profits from the sale of alcoholic beverages with the owner, operator, concessionaire, or lessee of the facility.  The holder of this license shall be permitted to conduct consumer wine, beer, and spirits tasting events and samplings for a fee or on a complimentary basis provided, however, the license holder complies with the provisions of section 3 of P.L.2009, c.216 (C.33:1-12d) and rules and regulations promulgated thereto.  Notwithstanding any law, rule or regulation to the contrary, the holder of this license shall be entitled to establish an all-inclusive area within the licensed sporting facility, provided the all-inclusive area is limited to one area within the sporting facility for each game or event and the capacity of the all-inclusive area does not exceed 500 persons. The fee for this license shall be $2,500 for venues with a capacity of less than 7,500 persons; $5,000 for venues with a capacity of not less than 7,500 persons but not more than 14,999 persons; $7,500 for venues with a capacity of not less than 15,000 persons but not more than 22,499 persons; and $10,000 for venues with a capacity of 22,500 persons or more. For the purposes of this subsection: "Sporting facility" means a stadium, arena, team training facility, or similar venue located on public property where alcoholic beverages are served or sold at retail for consumption on the premises by the glass or other open receptacle or in original containers. "Team training facility" shall include team offices and team headquarters. Restricted convenience store license 7.  The holder of this license shall be entitled, subject to rules and regulations, to sell malt beverages and wine in connection with the operation of a convenience store for consumption off the licensed premises and in original containers.  The holder of this license shall ensure that a minimum of 20 percent of the alcoholic beverage products displayed for retail sale shall be products manufactured in this State by the holder of a limited brewery license, restricted brewery license, plenary winery license, farm winery license, or cidery and meadery license issued pursuant to R.S.33:1-10.  A license holder may sell, display, or offer for sale alcoholic beverages in any location of the convenience store floor area and the restriction on the sale and display of alcoholic beverages pursuant to section 3 of P.L.2021, c.48 (C.33:1-101) shall not apply to alcoholic beverages sold pursuant to this subsection. A municipality that prohibits the sale of alcoholic beverages within its borders may establish by ordinance or resolution that no restricted convenience store license shall be granted within its respective municipality.  The restriction in section 2 of P.L.1947, c.94 (C.33:1-12.14) concerning the number of retail distribution licenses that may be issued in a municipality shall not apply to a license issued pursuant to this section. The license shall be issued by the director and may be renewed annually.  The initial issuance fee for the license shall be $5,000. Twenty-five percent of the initial issuance fee shall be allocated to the director and the remaining 75 percent of the fee shall be allocated to the municipality in which the licensed premises is located. The annual renewal fee shall be $1,000, which shall be divided equally between the division and the municipal governing body. As used in this subsection: Convenience store means a retail establishment that has a minimum gross square footage of 800 and maximum square footage of 5,000 and at which the principal and primary business is the sale of groceries and other foodstuffs for primarily off-premises consumption and may also include the sale of household items, tobacco products, lottery tickets, and motor fuel. (cf: P.L.2018, c.147, s.1) 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.